North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 7. North Carolina Game Law of 1935. [Repealed]

§§ 113-82 through 113-99.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

Cross References.

For present game laws, see Subchapter IV of this Chapter,

G.S. 113-127

et seq.

For repealed sections and local acts continued in effect as to particular counties, see

G.S. 113-133.1

.

§ 113-99.1.

Recodified as

G.S. 113-270.2

A.

§§ 113-100 through 113-109.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

Cross References.

For present game laws, see Subchapter IV of this Chapter,

G.S. 113-127

et seq.

For repealed sections and local acts continued in effect as to particular counties, see

G.S. 113-133.1

.

§§ 113-109.1 through 113-109.5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.